Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1017.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5028.2 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this section:


1. “Individualized education program” or “IEP” means, in


accordance with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, a


specially designed instruction for the individual child to access


classroom instruction and activities to receive a free and


appropriate public education (FAPE) in the least restrictive


environment for the individual child. The IEP shall contain goals


with short term objectives, and each shall have objective means of

Req. No. 1462 Page 1


measuring. As provided by the Individuals with Disabilities


Education Act:


a. any related service identified as therapy such as


physical therapy, occupational therapy, speech


language therapy, behavioral therapy, and


psychological therapy is considered medical and


therefore shall not be written into the IEP,


b. medically necessary related services, accommodations,


modifications, and assistive technology shall be


attached to the IEP, and


c. only medically necessary related services that are


educationally necessary for the child to access


classroom instruction to make sure the child receives


a Free and Appropriate Public Education (FAPE) may be


written into the IEP.


Related services, medical, assistive technology, modifications,


and accommodations shall be attached to the child’s Individualized


Educational Plan, not written in the IEP;


2. “School-based services” means specially designed instruction


and services that are educationally necessary for the eligible


student to receive a free and appropriate public education. This


excludes medically necessary services that are not included within


the definition of “educationally necessary” under the Individuals


with Disabilities Education Act, such as non-educational health-

Req. No. 1462 Page 2


related and rehabilitative services including, but not limited to,


health examinations, immunizations, flu vaccines, eye examinations,


speech and language therapy, physical therapy, occupational therapy,


social work services, and psychological and counseling services.


These services are not the responsibility of the Oklahoma K-12


public schools and shall be the responsibility of the parents or


guardians to provide for their children off campus and after school


hours.


B. The state Medicaid program may cover educationally-necessary


school-based services in accordance with this section. The Oklahoma


Health Care Authority shall not:


1. Define school-based services more broadly than defined under


this section or the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act; or


2. Cover school-based health care that is not educationally


necessary under this section or the Individuals with Disabilities


Education Act.


C. School-based services may be provided only by a qualified


school provider to a student under twenty-one (21) years of age


pursuant to an individualized education program (IEP), in accordance


with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act. Payment may


be made only to qualified school providers for delivery of school-


based services, provided that such services are educationally


necessary to receive a free and appropriate public education, and


sufficiently supported by appropriate documentation.

Req. No. 1462 Page 3


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1462 DC 1/16/2025 2:25:18 PM



































Req. No. 1462 Page 4